California statutes. Water Code
(History: Added by renumbering Section 10753.8 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 603, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10753.10.

In adopting rules and regulations pursuant to Section 10753.9, the local agency shall consider the potential impact of those rules and regulations on business activities, including agricultural operations, and to the extent practicable and consistent with the protection of the groundwater resources, minimize any adverse impacts on those business activities.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 10753.9 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 603, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10753.11.

A plan shall not be considered invalid, and the local agency shall not be required to recirculate the plan for public comment or to delay implementation of the plan, if the local agency substantially complies with the public notice provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 572, Sec. 7.   (AB 359)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Finances [10754. - 10754.3.]

10754.

For purposes of groundwater management, a local agency that adopts a groundwater management plan pursuant to this part has the authority of a water replenishment district pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 60220) of Division 18 and may fix and collect fees and assessments for groundwater management in accordance with Part 6 (commencing with Section 60300) of Division 18.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10754.2.

(a) Subject to Section 10754.3, except as specified in subdivision (b), a local agency that adopts a groundwater management plan pursuant to this part, may impose equitable annual fees and assessments for groundwater management based on the amount of groundwater extracted from the groundwater basin within the area included in the groundwater management plan to pay for costs incurred by the local agency for groundwater management, including, but not limited to, the costs associated with the acquisition of replenishment water, administrative and operating costs, and costs of construction of capital facilities necessary to implement the groundwater management plan.

(b) The local agency may not impose fees or assessments on the extraction and replacement of groundwater pursuant to a groundwater remediation program required by other provisions of law or a groundwater storage contract with the local agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 320, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10754.3.

Before a local agency may levy a water management assessment pursuant to Section 10754.2 or otherwise fix and collect fees for the replenishment or extraction of groundwater pursuant to this part, the local agency shall hold an election on the proposition of whether or not the local agency shall be authorized to levy a groundwater management assessment or fix and collect fees for the replenishment or extraction of groundwater. The local agency shall be so authorized if a majority of the votes cast at the election is in favor of the proposition. The election shall be conducted in the manner prescribed by the laws applicable to the local agency or, if there are no laws so applicable, then as prescribed by laws relating to local elections. The election shall be conducted only within the portion of the jurisdiction of the local agency subject to groundwater management pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Miscellaneous [10755. - 10755.4.]

10755.

(a) If a local agency annexes land subject to a groundwater management plan adopted pursuant to this part, the local agency annexing the land shall comply with the groundwater management plan for the annexed property.

(b) If a local agency subject to a groundwater management plan adopted pursuant to this part annexes land not subject to a groundwater management plan adopted pursuant to this part at the time of annexation, the annexed territory shall be subject to the groundwater management plan of the local agency annexing the land.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10755.2.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage local agencies, within the same groundwater basin, that are authorized to adopt groundwater management plans pursuant to this part, to adopt and implement a coordinated groundwater management plan.

(b) For the purpose of adopting and implementing a coordinated groundwater management program pursuant to this part, a local agency may enter into a joint powers agreement pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code with public agencies, or a memorandum of understanding with public or private entities providing water service.

(c) A local agency may enter into agreements with public entities or private parties for the purpose of implementing a coordinated groundwater management plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 320, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10755.3.

Local agencies within the same groundwater basin that conduct groundwater management programs within that basin pursuant to this part, and cities and counties that either manage groundwater pursuant to this part or have ordinances relating to groundwater within that basin, shall, at least annually, meet to coordinate those programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 833, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10755.4.

Except in those groundwater basins that are subject to critical conditions of groundwater overdraft, as identified in the department’s Bulletin 118–80, revised on December 24, 1982, the requirements of a groundwater management plan that is implemented pursuant to this part do not apply to the extraction of groundwater by means of a groundwater extraction facility that is used to provide water for domestic purposes to a single-unit residence and, if applicable, any dwelling unit authorized to be constructed pursuant to Section 65852.1 or Article 2 (commencing with Section 66314) of Chapter 13 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 7, Sec. 32.   (SB 477)   Effective March 25, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.76. GROUNDWATER QUALITY MONITORING [10780. - 10783.]

10780.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Groundwater Quality Monitoring Act of 2001.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 522, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

10781.

In order to improve comprehensive groundwater monitoring and increase the availability to the public of information about groundwater contamination, the state board, in consultation with other responsible agencies, as specified in this section, shall do all of the following:

(a) Integrate existing monitoring programs and design new program elements as necessary to establish a comprehensive monitoring program capable of assessing each groundwater basin in the state through direct and other statistically reliable sampling approaches. The interagency task force established pursuant to subdivision (b) shall determine the constituents to be included in the monitoring program. In designing the comprehensive monitoring program, the state board, among other things, shall integrate projects established in response to the Supplemental Report of the 1999 Budget Act, strive to take advantage of and incorporate existing data whenever possible, and prioritize groundwater basins that supply drinking water.

(b) (1) Create an interagency task force for all of the following purposes:

(A) Identifying actions necessary to establish the monitoring program.

(B) Identifying measures to increase coordination among state and federal agencies that collect information regarding groundwater contamination in the state.

(C) Designing a database capable of supporting the monitoring program that is compatible with the state board’s geotracker database.

(D) Assessing the scope and nature of necessary monitoring enhancements.

(E) Identifying the cost of any recommended measures.

(F) Identifying the means by which to make monitoring information available to the public.

(2) The interagency task force shall consist of a representative of each of the following entities:

(A) The state board.

(B) The department.

(C) The State Department of Health Services.

(D) The Department of Pesticide Regulation.

(E) The Department of Toxic Substances Control.

(F) The Department of Food and Agriculture.

(c) Convene an advisory committee to the interagency task force, with a membership that includes all of the following:

(1) Two representatives of appropriate federal agencies, if those agencies wish to participate.

(2) Two representatives of public water systems, one of which shall be a representative of a retail water supplier.

(3) Two representatives of environmental organizations.

(4) Two representatives of the business community.

(5) One representative of a local agency that is currently implementing a plan pursuant to Part 2.75 (commencing with Section 10750).

(6) Two representatives of agriculture.

(7) Two representatives from groundwater management entities.

(d) (1) The members of the advisory committee may receive a per diem allowance for each day’s attendance at a meeting of the advisory committee.

(2) The members of the advisory committee may be reimbursed for actual and necessary travel expenses incurred in connection with their official duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 522, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

10782.

(a) On or before June 1, 2009, the state board shall do both of the following:

(1) Identify and recommend to the Legislature funding options to extend, until January 1, 2024, the comprehensive monitoring program established in accordance with Section 10781.

(2) Make recommendations to enhance the public accessibility of information on groundwater conditions.

(b) On or before January 1, 2012, the state board, in consultation with the State Department of Public Health, the Department of Water Resources, the Department of Pesticide Regulation, the Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, and any other agencies as appropriate, shall submit to the Legislature a report that does all of the following:

(1) Identifies communities that rely on contaminated groundwater as a primary source of drinking water.

 (2) Identifies in the groundwater sources for the communities described in paragraph (1) the principal contaminants and other constituents of concern, as identified by the state board, affecting that groundwater and contamination levels.

(3) Identifies potential solutions and funding sources to clean up or treat groundwater or to provide alternative water supplies to ensure the provision of safe drinking water to communities identified in paragraph (1).

(c) The state board shall provide an opportunity for public comment on the report required pursuant to subdivision (b), prior to finalizing the report and submitting it to the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 670, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10782.3.

The state board shall use existing resources to carry out this part, and the operation of the program set forth in this part shall not supplant the operation of any other program required to be undertaken by the state board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 522, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

10783.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that protecting the state’s groundwater for beneficial use, particularly sources and potential sources of drinking water, is of paramount concern.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares that strategic, scientifically based groundwater monitoring of the state’s oil and gas fields is critical to allaying the public’s concerns regarding well stimulation treatments of oil and gas wells.

(c) On or before July 1, 2015, in order to assess the potential effects of well stimulation treatments, as defined in Article 3 (commencing with Section 3150) of Chapter 1 of Division 3 of the Public Resources Code, on the state’s groundwater resources in a systematic way,
 the state board shall develop model groundwater monitoring criteria, to be implemented either on a well-by-well basis for a well subject to well stimulation treatment or on a regional scale. The model criteria shall address a range of spatial sampling scales from methods for conducting appropriate monitoring on individual oil and gas wells subject to a well stimulation treatment, to methods for conducting a regional groundwater monitoring program. The state board shall take into consideration the recommendations received pursuant to subdivision (d) and shall include in the model criteria, at a minimum, the components identified in subdivision (f). The state board shall prioritize monitoring of groundwater that is or has the potential to be a source of drinking water, but shall protect all waters designated for any beneficial use.

(d) The state board, in consultation with the Department of Conservation,
 Geologic Energy Management Division, shall seek the advice of experts on the design of the model groundwater monitoring criteria. The experts shall assess and make recommendations to the state board on the model criteria. These recommendations shall prioritize implementation of regional groundwater monitoring programs statewide, as warranted, based upon the prevalence of well stimulation treatments of oil and gas wells and groundwater suitable as a source of drinking water.

(e) The state board shall also seek the advice of stakeholders representing the diverse interests of the oil- and gas-producing areas of the state. The stakeholders shall include the oil and gas industry, agriculture, environmental justice, and local government, among others, with regional representation commensurate with the intensity of oil and gas development in that area. The stakeholders shall also make recommendations to the
 state board regarding the development and implementation of groundwater monitoring criteria, including priority locations for implementation.

(f) The scope and nature of the model groundwater monitoring criteria shall include the determination of all of the following:

(1) An assessment of the areas to conduct groundwater quality monitoring and their appropriate boundaries.

(2) A list of the constituents to measure and assess water quality.

(3) The location, depth, and number of monitoring wells necessary to detect groundwater contamination at spatial scales ranging from an individual oil and gas well to a regional groundwater basin including one or more oil and gas fields.

(4) The
 frequency and duration of the monitoring.

(5) A threshold criteria indicating a transition from well-by-well monitoring to a regional monitoring program.

(6) Data collection and reporting protocols.

(7) Public access to the collected data under paragraph (6).

(g) Factors to consider in addressing subdivision (f) shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The existing quality and existing and potential use of the groundwater.

(2) Groundwater that is not a source of drinking water consistent with the United States Environmental Protection Agency’s definition of an Underground Source of Drinking Water as
 containing less than 10,000 milligrams per liter total dissolved solids in groundwater (40 C.F.R. 144.3), including exempt aquifers pursuant to Section 146.4 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) Proximity to human population, public water service wells, and private groundwater use, if known.

(4) The presence of existing oil and gas production fields, including the distribution, physical attributes, and operational status of oil and gas wells therein.

(5) Events, including well stimulation treatments and oil and gas well failures, among others, that have the potential to contaminate groundwater, appropriate monitoring to evaluate whether groundwater contamination can be attributable to a particular event, and any monitoring changes necessary if groundwater contamination is observed.

(h) (1) On or before January 1, 2016, the state board or appropriate regional board shall begin implementation of the regional groundwater monitoring programs based upon the model criteria developed under subdivision (c).

(2) In the absence of state implementation of a regional groundwater monitoring program, a well owner or operator may develop and implement an area-specific groundwater monitoring program, for the purpose of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 3160 of the Public Resources Code, based upon the model criteria developed under subdivision (c), subject to approval by the state or regional board, and that meets the requirements of this section.

(i) The model criteria for either a well-by-well basis for a well subject to well stimulation treatment, or for a
 regional groundwater monitoring program, shall be used to satisfy the permitting requirements for well stimulation treatments on oil and gas wells pursuant to Section 3160 of the Public Resources Code. The model criteria used on a well-by-well basis for a well subject to a well stimulation treatment shall be used where no regional groundwater monitoring plan approved by the state or regional board, if applicable, exists and has been implemented by either the state or regional board or the well owner or operator.

(j) The model criteria shall accommodate monitoring where surface access is limited. Monitoring is not required for oil and gas wells where the wells do not penetrate groundwater of beneficial use, as determined by a regional water quality control board, or solely penetrate exempt aquifers pursuant to Section 146.4 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(k) (1) The model criteria and groundwater monitoring programs shall be reviewed and updated periodically, as needed.

(2) The use of the United States Environmental Protection Agency’s definition of an Underground Source of Drinking Water as containing less than 10,000 milligrams per liter total dissolved solids in groundwater (40 C.F.R. 144.3) and whether exempt aquifers pursuant to Section 146.4 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations shall be subject to groundwater monitoring shall be reviewed by the state board through a public process on or before January 1, 2020.

(l) (1) All groundwater quality data collected pursuant to subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 3160 of the Public Resources Code shall be submitted to the state board in an electronic format that is compatible with the state
 board’s GeoTracker database, following the guidelines detailed in Chapter 30 (commencing with Section 3890) of Division 3 of Title 23 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) A copy of the reported data under paragraph (1) shall be transferred by the state board to a public, nonprofit doctoral-degree-granting educational institution located in the San Joaquin Valley, administered pursuant to Section 9 of Article IX of the California Constitution, in order to form the basis of a comprehensive groundwater quality data repository to promote research, foster interinstitutional collaboration, and seek understanding of the numerous factors influencing the state’s groundwater.

(m) The adoption of criteria required pursuant to this section is exempt from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of
 Title 2 of the Government Code). The adoption of criteria pursuant to this section shall instead be accomplished by means of a public process reasonably calculated to give those persons interested in their adoption an opportunity to be heard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 771, Sec. 23.   (AB 1057)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.78. LOCAL GROUNDWATER MANAGEMENT ASSISTANCE ACT OF 2000  [10795. - 10795.20.]

10795.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Local Groundwater Management Assistance Act of 2000.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 708, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10795.2.

There is hereby created the Local Groundwater Assistance Fund which shall be administered by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 708, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10795.4.

Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the money in the fund may be used by the department to assist local public agencies by awarding grants to those agencies to conduct groundwater studies or to carry out groundwater monitoring and management activities in accordance with Part 2.75 (commencing with Section 10750) or other authority pursuant to which local public agencies manage groundwater resources, or both, including the development of groundwater management plans, as provided for in subdivision (a) of Section 10753.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 603, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10795.6.

The department, in making grants pursuant to this part, shall do both of the following:

(a) Award grants based on the recommendations submitted by the Technical Advisory Panel. The panel shall give priority to a local public agency that has adopted a groundwater management plan and submitted an application that demonstrates collaboration by that local public agency with other local public agencies with regard to the management of the affected groundwater basin.

(b) Ensure that the money in the fund is allocated in a geographically balanced manner among the regions of the state that are capable of, and interested in, implementing groundwater management programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 708, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10795.8.

The department may enter into contracts and may adopt regulations subject to the advice and review of the Technical Advisory Panel, to carry out this part. Any grant contract entered into pursuant to this part may include provisions that the department determines are necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 708, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10795.10.

An application for a grant under this part shall be made to the department in the form and with the supporting materials prescribed by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 708, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10795.12.

(a) A Technical Advisory Panel shall review applications for grants based on criteria developed by the panel.

(b) The Technical Advisory Panel shall review applications and indicate whether, in its opinion, an application should be given priority pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 10795.6, and may place conditions on its recommendation for the funding of a specific project. These conditions may include requirements for additional clarification or further explanation of certain aspects of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 708, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10795.14.

(a) The Technical Advisory Panel shall be comprised of individuals appointed by the Secretary of the Resources Agency.

(b) (1) Panelists shall have background experience, or general knowledge, in the area of groundwater resources.

(2) Panelists shall include all of the following:

(A) At least three individuals who currently serve on the board of directors of a local public agency that has adopted a groundwater management plan.

(B) A licensed civil engineer.

(C) A licensed geologist.

(D) A licensed hydrogeologist.

(E) At least one individual representing each of the hydrologic study areas shown in Figure 3 of the department’s Bulletin 118-80, entitled “Ground Water Basins in California: A Report to the Legislature in Response to Water Code Section 12924.”

(c) The number of individuals serving on the Technical Advisory Panel shall be determined by the Secretary of the Resources Agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 708, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10795.16.

(a) If a member of the Technical Advisory Panel, or a member of his or her immediate family, is employed by a grant applicant , the employer of a grant applicant, or a consultant or independent contractor employed by a grant applicant, the panel member shall make that disclosure to the other members of the panel and shall not participate in the review of the grant application of that applicant.

(b) The Technical Advisory Panel shall operate on principles of collaboration. Panelists shall be appointed who are committed to working together with other interests for the long-term benefit of California groundwater resources and the people who rely on those resources.

(c) Panelists shall be residents of the state and have an interest in the preservation, protection, and enhancement of the state’s groundwater resources.

(d) Panelists shall not be employees of any state or federal agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 708, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10795.19.

A local public agency receiving a grant under this part shall submit to the department copies of all data collected pursuant to the grant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 708, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10795.20.

Federal funds may be used for the purposes of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 708, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.8. AGRICULTURAL WATER MANAGEMENT PLANNING [10800. - 10853.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Declarations and Policy [10800. - 10802.]

10800.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Agricultural Water Management Planning Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10801.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The waters of the state are a limited and renewable resource.

(b) The California Constitution requires that water in the state be used in a reasonable and beneficial manner. 

(c) The efficient use of agricultural water supplies is of great statewide concern.

(d) There is a great amount of reuse of delivered water, both inside and outside the water service areas of agricultural water suppliers.

(e) Significant noncrop beneficial uses are associated with agricultural water use, including the preservation and enhancement of fish and wildlife resources.

(f) Significant opportunities exist in some areas, through improved irrigation water management, to conserve water or to reduce the quantity of highly saline or toxic drainage water.

(g) Changes in water management practices should be carefully planned and implemented to minimize adverse effects on other beneficial uses currently being served.

(h) Agricultural water suppliers that receive water from the federal Central Valley Project are required by federal law to prepare and implement water conservation plans.

(i) Agricultural water users applying for a permit to appropriate water from the board are required to prepare and implement water conservation plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 15, Sec. 9.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10802.

The Legislature finds and declares that all of the following are the policies of the state:

(a) The efficient use of water shall be pursued actively to protect both the people of the state and the state’s water resources.

(b) The efficient use of agricultural water supplies shall be an important criterion in public decisions with regard to water.

(c) Agricultural water suppliers shall be required to prepare water management plans to achieve greater efficiency in the use of water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 15, Sec. 10.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions [10810. - 10817.]

10810.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10811.

“Agricultural water management plan” or “plan” means an agricultural water management plan prepared pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10812.

“Agricultural water supplier” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10608.12.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10813.

“Customer” means a purchaser of water from a water supplier who uses water for agricultural purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10814.

“Person” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10614.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 15, Sec. 11.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10815.

“Public agency” means any city, county, city and county, special district, or other public entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10816.

“Urban water supplier” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 10617.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10817.

“Water use efficiency” means the efficient management of water resources for beneficial uses, preventing waste, or accomplishing additional benefits with the same amount of water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 15, Sec. 12.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Agricultural Water Management Plans [10820. - 10845.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [10820. - 10821.]

10820.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), an agricultural water supplier shall prepare and adopt an agricultural water management plan in the manner set forth in this chapter on or before December 31, 2012, and shall update that plan on December 31, 2015.

(2) (A) The agricultural water management plan shall be updated on or before April 1, 2021, and thereafter on or before April 1 in the years ending in six and one. The plan shall satisfy the requirements of Section 10826. 

(B) An agricultural water supplier shall submit its plan to the department no later than 30 days after the
 adoption of the plan. The plan shall be submitted electronically and shall include any standardized forms, tables, or displays specified by the department.

(b) (1) The department shall review each plan that is due pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). The department may coordinate its review with the Department of Food and Agriculture and the board.

(2) The department shall notify an agricultural water supplier that it is not in compliance with this part if the department determines that actions are required to comply with the requirements of this part or if a supplier fails to update a plan as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). The department shall identify the specific deficiencies and the supplier shall have 120 days to remedy an
 identified deficiency. The department may provide additional time to remedy a deficiency if it finds that a supplier is making substantial progress toward remedying the deficiency. An agricultural water supplier that fails to submit corrective actions or a completed plan shall not be in compliance with this part.

(3) If the department has not received a plan or the department has determined that the plan submitted does not comply with the requirements of this part, and a revised plan has not been submitted, the department may undertake the following actions:

(A) Contract with a state academic institution or qualified entity to prepare or complete an agricultural water management plan on behalf of the supplier. The costs and expenses related to preparation or completion of a
 plan, including the costs of the contract and contract administration, shall be recoverable by the department from the supplier.

(B) If a supplier does not provide data necessary for the preparation or completion of a plan to the department or the contracting entity as determined by the department in accordance with subparagraph (A), the department may assess a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day, not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), until data is made available.

(4) (A) A plan prepared or completed pursuant to paragraph (3) shall be deemed the adopted plan for the supplier.

(B) Any action to challenge or invalidate the adequacy of the plan prepared or completed pursuant to
 paragraph (3) shall be brought against the supplier for whom the plan was prepared.

(c) Every supplier that becomes an agricultural water supplier after December 31, 2012, shall prepare and adopt an agricultural water management plan within one year after the date it has become an agricultural water supplier.

(d) A water supplier that indirectly provides water to customers for agricultural purposes shall not prepare a plan pursuant to this part without the consent of each agricultural water supplier that directly provides that water to its customers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 15, Sec. 13.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10821.

(a) An agricultural water supplier required to prepare a plan pursuant to this part shall notify each city or county within which the supplier provides water supplies that the agricultural water supplier will be preparing the plan or reviewing the plan and considering amendments or changes to the plan. The agricultural water supplier may consult with, and obtain comments from, each city or county that receives notice pursuant to this subdivision.

(b) The amendments to, or changes in, the plan shall be adopted and submitted in the manner set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 10840).

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contents of Plans [10825. - 10829.]

10825.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this part to allow levels of water management planning commensurate with the numbers of customers served and the volume of water supplied.

(b) This part does not require the implementation of water use efficiency programs or practices that are not locally cost effective.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 15, Sec. 14.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10826.

An agricultural water management plan shall be adopted in accordance with this chapter. The plan shall do all of the following:

(a) Describe the agricultural water supplier and the service area, including all of the following:

(1) Size of the service area.

(2) Location of the service area and its water management facilities.

(3) Terrain and soils.

(4) Climate.

(5) Operating rules and
 regulations.

(6) Water delivery measurements or calculations.

(7) Water rate schedules and billing.

(8) Water shortage allocation policies.

(b) Describe the quantity and quality of water resources of the agricultural water supplier, including all of the following:

(1) Surface water supply.

(2) Groundwater supply.

(3) Other water supplies, including recycled water.

(4) Source water quality monitoring practices.

(5) Water uses within the agricultural water supplier’s service area, including all of the following:

(A) Agricultural.

(B) Environmental.

(C) Recreational.

(D) Municipal and industrial.

(E) Groundwater recharge, including estimated flows from deep percolation from irrigation and seepage.

(c) Include an annual water budget based on the quantification of all inflow and outflow components for the service area of the agricultural water supplier. Components of inflow shall
 include surface inflow, groundwater pumping in the service area, and effective precipitation. Components of outflow shall include surface outflow, deep percolation, and evapotranspiration. An agricultural water supplier shall report the annual water budget on a water-year basis. The department shall provide tools and resources to assist agricultural water suppliers in developing and quantifying components necessary to develop a water budget. 

(d) Include an analysis, based on available information, of the effect of climate change on future water supplies.

(e) Describe previous water management activities.

(f) Identify water management objectives based on the water budget to improve water system efficiency or to meet other water management
 objectives. The agricultural water supplier shall identify, prioritize, and implement actions to reduce water loss, improve water system management, and meet other water management objectives identified in the plan. 

(g) Include in the plan information regarding efficient water management practices required pursuant to Section 10608.48.

(h) Quantify the efficiency of agricultural water use within the service area of the agricultural water supplier using the appropriate method or methods from among the four water use efficiency quantification methods developed by the department in the May 8, 2012, report to the Legislature entitled “A Proposed Methodology for Quantifying the Efficiency of Agricultural Water Use.” The agricultural water supplier shall account for all water uses,
 including crop water use, agronomic water use, environmental water use, and recoverable surface flows.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 15, Sec. 15.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10826.2.

As part of its agricultural water management plan, each agricultural water supplier shall develop a drought plan for periods of limited water supply describing the actions of the agricultural water supplier for drought preparedness and management of water supplies and allocations during drought conditions. The drought plan shall contain both of the following:

(a) Resilience planning, including all of the following:

(1) Data, indicators, and information needed to determine the water supply availability and levels of drought severity.

(2) Analyses and
 identification of potential vulnerability to drought.

(3) A description of the opportunities and constraints for improving drought resilience planning, including all of the following:

(A) The availability of new technology or information.
